Vermont, session 2025-2026, H632.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Battery Extended Producer Responsibility * * *
Sec. 1. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 152, Sec. 3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. ANR BATTERY ASSESSMENT
(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources 2027, the
stewardship organization formed pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 168 shall
complete an assessment of the opportunities, challenges, and feasibility of
establishing mandatory end-of-life management programs for the following
battery types:
(1) batteries used in hybrid and electric vehicles;
(2) battery energy storage systems; and
(3) batteries that are not easily removable from the products they power.
(b) The assessment required by this section shall include:
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 3 of 35
(1) a summary of the work and progress other states have made in
establishing end-of-life management programs for the three battery types listed
under subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) policy recommendations on whether mandatory end-of-life
management programs are necessary for the battery types listed under
subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The assessment required by this section shall be provided to the
Secretary of Natural Resources, the House Committee on Environment and
Energy, and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy.
* * * Fuel Storage Tanks * * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1927(d) is amended to read:
(d) No person shall deliver a regulated substance to a category one tank
that is visibly designated by the Agency as not having a valid permit or not
meeting standards adopted by the Secretary related to corrosion protection,
spill prevention, leak detection, financial responsibility, or overfill protection
that may result in the tank releasing a regulated substance into the
environment.
* * * Healthy Homes Initiative * * *
Sec. 3. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 78, Sec. B.1103 is amended to read:
Sec. B.1103 CLIMATE AND ENVIRONMENT – FISCAL YEAR 2024
ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 4 of 35
* * *
(j)(1) In fiscal year 2024, the amount of $6,100,000 American Rescue Plan
Act (ARPA) – Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Funds is appropriated to the
Department of Environmental Conservation for the Healthy Homes Initiative.
Funds shall be used to make repairs or improvements to drinking water,
wastewater, or stormwater systems for Vermonters who have low to moderate
income or who live in manufactured housing communities, or both.
(2) All information submitted to or compiled by the Department of
Environmental Conservation related to the issuance of individual funding
awards under the Healthy Homes Initiative shall be considered confidential
unless the person providing the information designates that it is not
confidential. This shall include all personal information of applicants that
request or receive funding. Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this subdivision
shall take effect on passage and shall apply retroactively to July 1, 2023.
* * *
* * * Flood Safety * * *
Sec. 4. 2024 Act and Resolves No. 121, Sec. 3 is amended to read:
Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION;
RIVER CORRIDOR BASE MAP; INFILL MAPPING;
EDUCATION AND OUTREACH
(a) On or before January 1, 2026 2027, the Department of Environmental
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 5 of 35
Conservation, in consultation with the Agency of Commerce and Community
Development and the regional planning commissions, shall amend by
procedure the statewide River Corridor Base Map to identify areas suitable for
development that are located within existing settlements and that will not cause
or contribute to increases in fluvial erosion hazards.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2025, and ending on January 1, 2027 2028, the
Department of Environmental Conservation shall conduct an education and
outreach program to consult with and collect input from municipalities,
environmental justice focus populations, the Environmental Justice Advisory
Council, businesses, property owners, farmers, and other members of the
public regarding how State permitting of development in mapped river
corridors will be implemented, including potential restrictions on the use of
land within mapped river corridors. The Department shall develop educational
materials for the public as part of its charge under this section. The
Department shall collect input from the public regarding the permitting of
development in mapped river corridors as proposed by this act. On or before
January 15, 2027 2028, and until permitting of development in mapped river
corridors begins under 10 V.S.A. § 754, the Department shall submit to the
Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy, the House Committee on
Environment and Energy, and the Environmental Justice Advisory Council a
report that shall include:
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 6 of 35
(1) a summary of the public input it received regarding State permitting
of development in mapped river corridors during the public education and
outreach required under this section;
(2) recommendations, based on the public input collected, for changes to
the requirements for State permitting of development in mapped river
corridors;
(3) an analysis and summary of State permitting of development in
mapped river corridors on environmental justice populations; and
(4) a summary of the Department’s progress in adopting the rules
required under 10 V.S.A. § 754 for the regulation of development in mapped
river corridors.
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 754 is amended to read:
§ 754. MAPPED RIVER CORRIDOR RULES
(a) Rulemaking authority.
(1) On or before July 1, 2027 July 15, 2028, the Secretary shall adopt
rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 that establish requirements for issuing
and enforcing permits for:
(A) all development within a mapped river corridor in the State; and
(B) for development exempt from municipal regulation in flood
hazard areas.
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 7 of 35
(2) The Secretary shall not adopt rules under this subsection that
regulate agricultural activities without the consent of the Secretary of
Agriculture, Food and Markets, provided that the Secretary of Agriculture,
Food and Markets shall not withhold consent under this subdivision when lack
of such consent would result in the State’s noncompliance with the National
Flood Insurance Program.
(3) The Secretary shall seek the guidance of the Federal Emergency
Management Agency in developing and drafting the rules required by this
section in order to ensure that the rules are sufficient to meet eligibility
requirements for the National Flood Insurance Program.
* * *
(e) Permit requirement. Beginning on January 1, 2028 July 1, 2029, a
person shall not commence or conduct development exempt from municipal
regulation in a flood hazard area or commence or conduct any development in
a mapped river corridor without a permit issued under the rules required under
subsection (a) of this section by the Secretary or by a State agency delegated
permitting authority under subsection (f) of this section. When an application
is filed under this section, the Secretary or delegated State agency shall
proceed in accordance with chapter 170 of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 8 of 35
Sec. 6. 2024 Acts and Resolves 121, Sec. 10 is amended to read:
Sec. 10. STUDY COMMITTEE ON STATE ADMINISTRATION OF
THE NATIONAL FLOOD INSURANCE PROGRAM
* * *
(e) Report. On or before August 15, 2025 2026, the Study Committee shall
submit a written report to the General Assembly with its findings and any
recommendations for legislative action. Any recommendation for legislative
action shall be as draft legislation.
* * *
Sec. 7. 2024 Acts and Resolves 121, Sec. 11(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall initiate rulemaking, including
pre-rulemaking, for the rules required in Sec. 5 of this act, 10 V.S.A. § 754
(river corridor development), not later than July 1, 2025. The rules shall be
adopted on or before July 1, 2027 2028.
* * * Wetlands * * *
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 918 is amended to read:
§ 918. NET GAIN OF WETLANDS; STATE GOAL; RULEMAKING
(a) On or before July 1 December 1, 2025, the Secretary of Natural
Resources shall amend the Vermont Wetlands Rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 to clarify that the goal of wetlands regulation and management in
the State is the net gain of wetlands to be achieved through protection of
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 9 of 35
existing wetlands and restoration of wetlands that were previously adversely
affected. This condition shall not apply to wetland, river, and flood plain
restoration projects, including dam removals.
* * *
(c) At a minimum, the Wetlands Rules shall be revised to:
(1) Require an applicant for a wetland permit that authorizes adverse
impacts to more than 5,000 square feet of wetlands to compensate for those
impacts through restoration, enhancement, or creation of wetland resources.
(2) Incorporate the net gain rule into requirements for permits issued
after September 1 December 1, 2025.
* * *
* * * Clean Water Service Providers * * *
Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 922 is amended to read:
§ 922. WATER QUALITY IMPLEMENTATION PLANNING AND
TARGETS
(a) After listing a water as impaired on the list of waters required by 33
U.S.C. § 1313(d), the Secretary shall include in the implementation plan for
the water a strategy for returning the water to compliance with the Vermont
Water Quality Standards. With respect to a water that is impaired due to
sources outside the State or if there is insufficient data or no data available to
quantify reductions required by this subchapter, the Secretary shall not be
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 10 of 35
required to implement the requirements of this subchapter; however, the
Secretary shall provide an alternate strategy for attaining water quality
standards in the implementation plan for the water. For waters determined to
be subject to this subchapter, the Secretary shall include the following in an
implementation plan:
* * *
(c) When implementing the requirements of this section, the Secretary shall
follow the type 3 notice process established in section 7714 of this title provide
notice to the public and a comment period of not less than 30 days.
Sec. 10. 10 V.S.A. § 923 is amended to read:
§ 923. QUANTIFICATION OF POLLUTION REDUCTION; CLEAN
WATER PROJECTS
(a) After listing a water as impaired on the list of waters required by 33
U.S.C. § 1313(d), the Secretary shall publish a methodology for calculating
pollution reduction values associated with a clean water project in that water.
When establishing a pollutant reduction value, the Secretary shall consider
pollution reduction values established in the TMDL; pollution reduction values
established by other jurisdictions; pollution reduction values recommended by
organizations that develop pollutant reduction values for a clean water project;
applicable monitored data with respect to a clean water project, if available;
modeled data, if available; or a comparison to other similar projects or
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 11 of 35
programs if no other data on a pollution reduction value or design life exists.
Pollution reduction values established by the Secretary shall be the exclusive
method for determining the pollutant reduction value of a clean water project.
* * *
(c)(1) If a person is proposing a clean water project for which no pollution
reduction value or design life exists for a listed water, the Secretary shall
publish a timeline, not to exceed one year, to establish a pollution reduction
value or design life for that clean water project within 60 days following a
request from the person proposing the clean water project. A pollution
reduction value or design life established under this subdivision shall be based
on a review of pollution reduction values established in the TMDL; pollution
reduction values or design lives established by other jurisdictions; pollution
reduction values or design lives recommended by organizations that develop
pollutant reduction values or design lives for a clean water project; applicable
monitored data with respect to a clean water project, if available; modeled
data, if available; actual data documenting the design life of a clean water
project; or a comparison to other similar projects or programs if no other data
on a pollution reduction value or design life exists. Any estimate timeline or
pollution reduction value or design life developed under this subsection by the
Secretary shall be posted on the Agency of Natural Resources’ website.
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 12 of 35
(2) Upon the request of a clean water service provider, the Secretary
shall evaluate a proposed clean water project and issue a determination as to
whether the proposed clean water project is eligible to receive funding as a part
of a Water Quality Restoration Formula Grant awarded by the State pursuant
to section 925 of this title.
* * *
(f)(1) When implementing the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of
this section, the Secretary shall follow the type 3 notice process established in
section 7714 of this title provide notice to the public and a comment period of
not less than 30 days.
(2) When implementing the requirements of subsection (c) of this
section, the Secretary shall follow the type 4 notice process in section 7715 of
this title provide notice to the public and a comment period of not less than 30
days.
* * * Stream Alteration * * *
Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 1021(a) is amended to read:
(a) A person shall not change, alter, or modify the course, current, or cross
section of any watercourse with a watershed area greater than 0.5 square miles
at the location of the proposed change, alteration, or modification or of
designated outstanding resource waters, within or along the boundaries of this
State either by movement, fill, or excavation of ten cubic yards or more of
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 13 of 35
instream material in any year, unless authorized by the Secretary. A person
shall not establish or construct a berm in a flood hazard area or river corridor,
as those terms are defined in subdivisions 752(3) and (11) of this title, unless
permitted by the Secretary or constructed as an emergency protective measure
under subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 12. 10 V.S.A. § 1022 is amended to read:
§ 1022. APPLICATION FOR ALTERATION
A person proposing to change, alter, or modify the course, current, or cross
section of a watercourse with a watershed area greater than 0.5 square miles at
the location of the proposed change, alteration, or modification shall apply in
writing to the Secretary for a permit to do so. The application shall describe
the location and purpose of the proposed change and shall be accompanied by
the maps and plans and other information the Secretary shall direct. When an
application is filed under this section, the Secretary shall proceed in
accordance with chapter 170 of this title and the requirements of this
subchapter.
Sec. 13. 10 V.S.A. § 1023(a) is amended to read:
(a) Upon receipt of an application, the Secretary shall cause an
investigation of the proposed change to be made. Prior to making a decision, a
written report shall be made by the Secretary concerning the effect of the
proposed change on the watercourse with a watershed area greater than 0.5
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 14 of 35
square miles. The permit shall be granted, subject to such conditions
determined to be warranted, if it appears that the change:
(1) will not adversely affect the public safety by increasing flood or
fluvial erosion hazards;
(2) will not significantly damage fish life or wildlife;
(3) will not significantly damage the rights of riparian owners; and
(4) in case of any waters designated by the Secretary as outstanding
resource waters, will not adversely affect the values sought to be protected by
designation.
* * * Stormwater * * *
Sec. 14. 10 V.S.A. § 1264(f) is amended to read:
(f) Rulemaking. On or before December 31, 2017, the Secretary shall
adopt rules to manage stormwater runoff. At a minimum, the rules shall:
(1) Establish as the primary goals of the rules:
(A) assuring compliance with the Vermont Water Quality Standards;
and
(B) maintenance after development, as nearly as possible, of the
predevelopment runoff characteristics.
(2) Establish criteria for the use of the basin planning process to
establish watershed-specific priorities for the management of stormwater
runoff.
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 15 of 35
(3) Assure consistency with applicable requirements of the federal Clean
Water Act.
(4) Include technical standards and best management practices that
address stormwater discharges from existing development, new development,
and redevelopment.
(5) Specify minimum requirements for inspection and maintenance of
stormwater management practices.
(6) Include standards for the management of stormwater runoff from
construction sites and other land disturbing activities.
(7) Allow municipal governments to assume the full legal responsibility
for a stormwater system permitted under these rules as a part of a permit issued
by the Secretary.
(8) Include standards with respect to the use of offsets and stormwater
impact fees.
(9) Include minimum standards for the issuance of stormwater permits
during emergencies for the repair or maintenance of stormwater infrastructure
during a state of emergency declared under 20 V.S.A. chapter 1 or during
flooding or other emergency conditions that pose an imminent risk to life or a
risk of damage to public or private property. Minimum standards adopted
under this subdivision shall comply with National Flood Insurance Program
requirements.
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 16 of 35
(10) To the extent appropriate, authorize in the permitting process use of
certifications of compliance by licensed professional engineers practicing
within the scope of their engineering specialty.
(11) Include standards for alternative best management practices for
stormwater permitting of renewable energy projects and telecommunication
facilities located in high-elevation settings, provided that the alternative best
management practices shall be designed to:
(A) minimize the extent and footprint of stormwater-treatment
practices in order to preserve vegetation and trees;
(B) adapt to and minimize impact to ecosystems, shallow soils, and
sensitive streams found in high-elevation settings;
(C) account for the temporary nature and infrequent use of
construction and access roads for high-elevation projects; and
(D) maintain the predevelopment runoff characteristics, as nearly as
possible, after development.
(12) Establish best management practices for improving healthy soils in
order to improve the capacity of soil to retain water, improve flood resiliency,
reduce sedimentation, and prevent stormwater runoff.
Sec. 15. 10 V.S.A. § 1264(g) is amended to read:
(g) General permits.
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 17 of 35
(1) The Secretary may issue general permits for classes of stormwater
runoff that shall be adopted and administered in accordance with the provisions
of subsection 1263(b) of this title.
* * *
(3) Within 120 days after the adoption by the Secretary of the rules
required under subsection (f) of this section, the Secretary shall issue a general
permit under this section for discharges of stormwater from impervious surface
of three or more acres in size, when the stormwater discharge previously was
not permitted or was permitted under an individual permit or general permit
that did not incorporate the requirements of the 2002 Stormwater Management
Manual or any subsequently adopted Stormwater Management Manual. Under
the general permit, the Secretary shall:
* * *
(D) Allow the use of stormwater impact fees, offsets, and phosphorus
credit trading within the watershed of the water to which the stormwater
discharges or runs off.
* * * Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations * * *
Sec. 16. 6 V.S.A. § 4851(a) is amended to read:
(a) No person shall, without a Large Farm Operation permit from the
Secretary, construct a new barn, or expand an existing barn, designed to house
more than 700 mature dairy animals, 1,000 cattle or cow/calf cow or calf pairs,
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 18 of 35
1,000 veal calves, 2,500 swine weighing over 55 pounds, 10,000 swine
weighing less than 55 pounds, 500 horses, 10,000 sheep or lambs, 55,000
turkeys, 30,000 laying hens or broilers with a liquid manure handling system,
82,000 laying hens without a liquid manure handling system, 125,000 chickens
other than laying hens without a liquid manure handling system, 5,000 ducks
with a liquid manure handling system, or 30,000 ducks without a liquid
manure handling system. No permit shall be required to replace an existing
barn in use for livestock or domestic fowl production at its existing capacity.
The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, in consultation with the
Secretary of Natural Resources, shall review any application for a permit under
this section with regard to water quality impacts prior to approval of a permit
under this subsection. If, upon review of a large farm application for a permit
under this subsection, the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
determines that the farm may be discharging to waters of the State, the
Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall promptly refer the potential
discharge to the Secretary of Natural Resources for response in accordance
with the federal Clean Water Act regarding concentrated animal feeding
operations. The Secretary of Natural Resources shall direct a large farm to
obtain a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit under 10
V.S.A. § 1263 if required by federal regulations for concentrated animal
feeding operations or by the VPDES CAFO Rules. If the farm is not required
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 19 of 35
to obtain a CAFO permit and is not in violation of federal regulations for
Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations, the Secretary of Natural Resources
shall promptly notify the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.
Sec. 17. 10 V.S.A. § 1263 is amended to read:
§ 1263. DISCHARGE PERMITS
(a) Any person who intends to discharge waste into the waters of the State
or who intends to discharge into an injection well or who intends to discharge
into any publicly owned treatment works any waste that interferes with, passes
through without treatment, or is otherwise incompatible with that works or
would have a substantial adverse effect on that works or on water quality, or is
required to apply for a CAFO permit, shall make application to the Secretary
for a discharge permit. Application shall be made on a form prescribed by the
Secretary. An applicant shall pay an application fee in accordance with
3 V.S.A. § 2822.
* * *
(g) Any person who owns or operates a concentrated animal feeding
operation that requires a permit under the federal National Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System permit regulations or the VPDES CAFO Rules shall
submit an application to the Secretary for a discharge permit and pay the
required fees specified in 3 V.S.A. § 2822. Not later than December 15, 2025
September 1, 2027, the Secretary shall amend and issue the CAFO General
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 20 of 35
Permit and Notice of Intent. Not later than July 1, 2026, the Secretary shall
issue a CAFO application and an individual CAFO permit. The Secretary may
request any additional information from a farm as necessary to process a
permit and administer the CAFO program. The Secretary may direct a farm to
apply for an individual or general permit in accordance with the procedural
requirements of subsection (b) of this section.
(h) A large CAFO shall not be required to have a CAFO permit unless one
of the following conditions are is met:
(1) wastes are discharged into waters via a point source;
(2) wastes are discharged directly into waters that originate outside or
pass over, across, or through the facility or otherwise come into direct contact
with the animals confined in the operation; or
(3) a precipitation-related discharge of manure, litter, or process
wastewater from land areas under the control of a LFO has occurred that was
not in accordance with site-specific nutrient management practices that ensure
appropriate agricultural utilization of the nutrients in the manure, litter, or
process wastewater, as determined by the Secretary; or
(4) the Secretary determines in the Secretary’s discretion that a CAFO
permit is required.
(i) The Secretary shall require nutrient management plans for all CAFOs
and shall include the plans approved by the Secretary in the permits for public
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 21 of 35
comment in accordance with the process set forth in chapter 170 of this title.
The Secretary may amend a permit in accordance with chapter 170 of this title
or revoke a permit in accordance with 3 V.S.A. § 814.
(j) Once a CAFO is covered under a CAFO permit, the farm shall be
covered for the five-year duration of the permit. A farm covered by a CAFO
permit shall renew the permit be renewed in accordance with its terms, unless
the farm wants to opt out and can demonstrate it is not discharging and shall
accordingly comply with the federal CWA and the Vermont CAFO rules.
Sec. 18. 10 V.S.A. § 1351 is amended to read:
§ 1351. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(2)(A) “Animal feeding operation” or “AFO” means a lot or facility,
other than an aquatic animal production facility, where the following
conditions are met:
(i) animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be
stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of 45 days or more in any
12-month period; and
(ii) crops, vegetation, or forage growth are not sustained in the
normal growing season over any portion of the lot or facility.
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 22 of 35
(B) Two or more individual farms qualifying as an AFO that are
under common ownership and that adjoin each other or use a common area or
system for the disposal of waste shall be considered to be a single AFO if the
combined number of livestock or domestic fowl on the combined farm
qualifies the combined farm as a large CAFO as defined in subdivision (5) of
this section or as a medium CAFO as defined in subdivision (8) of this section
Two or more AFOs under common ownership are considered to be a single
AFO for the purposes of determining the number of animals at an operation, if
they adjoin each other or if they use a common area or system for the disposal
of wastes.
(3) “Concentrated animal feeding operation” or “CAFO” means an AFO
that is defined as a large CAFO, a medium CAFO, or a small CAFO.
* * *
(5) “Large concentrated animal feeding operation” or “Large large
CAFO” means an AFO that houses 700 or more mature dairy animals, whether
milked or dry, 1,000 or more cattle or cow or calf pairs, 1,000 or more veal
calves, 2,500 or more swine weighing over 55 pounds, 10,000 or more swine
weighing 55 pounds or less, 500 or more horses, 10,000 or more sheep or
lambs, 55,000 or more turkeys, 30,000 or more laying hens or broilers with a
liquid manure handling system, 82,000 or more laying hens without a liquid
manure handling system, 125,000 or more chickens other than laying hens
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 23 of 35
without a liquid manure handling system, 5,000 or more ducks with a liquid
manure handling system, or 30,000 or more ducks without a liquid manure
handling system.
(6) “Large farm operation” or “LFO” has the same meaning as in 6
V.S.A. chapter 215 means an AFO that stables or confines as many as or more
than the numbers of animals specified in any of the following categories: (i)
700 mature dairy cows, whether milked or dry; (ii) 1,000 veal calves; (iii)
1,000 cattle other than mature dairy cows or veal calves (includes heifers,
steers, bulls, and cow or calf pairs); (iv) 2,500 swine each weighing 55 pounds
or more; (v) 10,000 swine each weighing less than 55 pounds; (vi) 500 horses;
(vii) 10,000 sheep or lambs; (viii) 55,000 turkeys; (ix) 30,000 laying hens or
broilers, if the AFO uses a liquid manure handling system; (x) 125,000
chickens (other than laying hens), if the AFO uses other than a liquid manure
handling system; (xi) 82,000 laying hens, if the AFO uses other than a liquid
manure handling system; (xii) 30,000 ducks, if the AFO uses other than a
liquid manure handling system; or (xiii) 5,000 ducks, if the AFO uses a liquid
manure handling system.
* * *
(8) “Medium concentrated animal feeding operation” or “medium
CAFO” means an AFO that is defined as an AFO by the VPDES CAFO Rules
adopted by the Secretary, including an AFO that:
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 24 of 35
(A) houses 200 to 699 mature dairy animals, whether milked or dry,
300 to 999 cattle or cow or calf pairs, 300 to 999 veal calves, 750 to 2,499
swine weighing over 55 pounds, 3,000 to 9,999 swine weighing 55 pounds or
less, 150 to 499 horses, 3,000 to 9,999 sheep or lambs, 16,500 to 54,999
turkeys, 9,000 to 29,999 laying hens or broilers with a liquid manure handling
system, 25,000 to 81,999 laying hens without a liquid manure handling system,
37,500 to 124,999 chickens other than laying hens without a liquid manure
handling system, 1,500 to 4,999 ducks with a liquid manure handling system,
or 10,000 to 29,999 ducks without a liquid manure handling system; and
(B) either of the following conditions are met:
(i) wastes are discharged into waters through a man-made ditch,
flushing system, or other similar man-made device; or
(ii) wastes are discharged directly into waters that originate
outside of or pass over, across, or through the facility or otherwise come into
direct contact with the animals confined in the operation.
(9) “Medium farm operation” or “MFO” has the same meaning as
medium farm operation in 6 V.S.A chapter 215 and rules adopted under the
chapter means any AFO with the following type and number of animals: 200
to 699 mature dairy cows, whether milked or dry; 300 to 999 veal calves; 300
to 999 cattle other than mature dairy cows or veal calves (includes heifers,
steers, bulls, and cow or calf pairs); 750 to 2,499 swine each weighing 55
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 25 of 35
pounds or more; 3,000 to 9,999 swine each weighing less than 55 pounds; 150
to 499 horses; 3,000 to 9,999 sheep or lambs; 16,500 to 54,999 turkeys; 9,000
to 29,999 laying hens or broilers, if the AFO uses a liquid manure handling
system; 37,500 to 124,999 chickens (other than laying hens), if the AFO uses
other than a liquid manure handling system; 25,000 to 81,999 laying hens, if
the AFO uses other than a liquid manure handling system; 10,000 to 29,999
ducks, if the AFO uses other than a liquid manure handling system; or 1,500 to
4,999 ducks, if the AFO uses a liquid manure handling system.
(10) “Point source” means any discernible, confined, and discrete
conveyance, including any pipe, ditch, channel, tunnel, conduit, well, discrete
fissure, container, rolling stock, concentrated animal feeding operation, or
vessel or other floating craft from which pollutants are or may be discharged.
This term does not include agricultural stormwater discharges and return flows
from irrigated agriculture.
(11) “Process wastewater” means water directly or indirectly used in the
operation of an AFO or CAFO for any or all of the following: spillage or
overflow from animal or poultry watering systems; washing, cleaning, or
flushing pens, barns, manure pits, or other AFO or CAFO facilities; direct
contact swimming, washing, or spray cooling of animals; or dust control.
Process wastewater also includes any water that comes into contact with any
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 26 of 35
raw materials, products, or byproducts, including manure, litter, feed, milk,
eggs, or bedding.
(12) “Production area” means that part of an AFO or CAFO that
includes the animal confinement area, the manure storage area, the raw
materials storage area, and the waste containment areas. The animal
confinement area includes open lots, housed lots, feedlots, confinement houses,
stall barns, free stall barns, milkrooms, milking centers, cowyards, barnyards,
medication pens, walkers, animal walkways, and stables. The manure storage
area includes lagoons, runoff ponds, storage sheds, stockpiles, under house or
pit storages, liquid impoundments, static piles, and composting piles. The raw
materials storage area includes feed silos, silage bunkers, and bedding
materials. The waste containment area includes settling basins, and areas
within berms and diversions that separate uncontaminated storm water
stormwater. Also included in the definition of production area is any egg
washing or egg processing facility and any area used in the storage, handling,
treatment, or disposal of mortalities.
(13) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(14) “Small animal feeding operation” or “SFO” means an AFO that is
not a large CAFO or a medium CAFO.
(15) “Small concentrated animal feeding operation” or “small CAFO”
means a small AFO designated as a small CAFO by the Secretary upon
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 27 of 35
determining that the AFO is a significant contributor of pollutants to waters of
the State and is defined as a CAFO by the regulations adopted under the
federal Clean Water Act.
(16) “Waters of the United States” shall have has the same meaning as defined
by the federal Clean Water Act.
Sec. 19. 10 V.S.A. § 1352 is amended to read:
§ 1352. POWERS OF THE SECRETARY
The Secretary has the authority to exercise all of the following:
(1) Implement the federal Clean Water Act to administer a Vermont
pollutant discharge elimination system (VPDES) CAFO program that is at
least as stringent as the federal Clean Water Act and enabling rules.
(2) Make, adopt, revise, and amend rules as necessary to administer a
VPDES CAFO program that is at least as stringent as the federal Clean Water
Act and enabling rules.
(3) Make, adopt, revise, and amend procedures, guidelines, inspection
checklists, and other documents as necessary for the administration of the
VPDES CAFO program.
(4) Designate any AFO that meets the definition of a CAFO under the
federal Clean Water Act regulations or under the VPDES CAFO Rule as a
CAFO, in the Secretary’s sole discretion.
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 28 of 35
(5) Establish technical standards and require a CAFO to comply with
technical standards that are consistent with current U.S. Department of
Agriculture nutrient management standards, vegetative buffers, and any other
CAFO requirements that comply with the federal Clean Water Act and
enabling rules, such as 40 CFR § 412.4 and 40 CFR § 123.36.
(6) Require any AFO to obtain a CAFO permit under this chapter upon a
determination that the AFO is discharging to waters of the State.
(6)(7) Designate any small AFO as a CAFO if after an on-site
inspection, the Secretary determines that the small AFO is discharging into
water and is a significant contributor of pollutants to waters of the State. The
Secretary shall consider the following factors:
(A) the size of the AFO and the amount of wastes reaching waters;
(B) the location of the AFO relative to waters;
(C) the means of conveyance of animal wastes and process waste
waters wastewaters into waters;
(D) the slope, vegetation, rainfall, and other factors affecting the
likelihood or frequency of discharge of animal wastes, manure, and process
wastewaters into waters; and
(E) other relevant factors.
(7)(8) Access private or public property to inspect AFOs and CAFOs,
take photos and samples, and review and copy AFO and CAFO land
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 29 of 35
management records, including nutrient management plans, as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.
(8)(9) Solicit and receive federal funds to implement the CAFO
program.
(9)(10) Cooperate fully with the federal government or other agencies in
the operation of any joint federal-state programs concerning the regulation of
agricultural pollution.
(10)(11) Appoint assistants or contract with persons with applicable
expertise, subject to applicable laws and State policies, to perform or assist in
the performance of the duties and functions of the Secretary under this chapter.
Sec. 20. 10 V.S.A. § 1353 is amended to read:
§ 1353. CAFO PERMIT REQUIREMENTS AND EXEMPTIONS
(a) The discharge of manure, litter, or process wastewater to waters of the
State from a permitted CAFO as a result of the application of that manure,
litter, or process wastewater by the CAFO to land areas under its control is a
discharge from that CAFO subject to VPDES permit requirements, except
where it is an agricultural stormwater discharge as provided under the federal
Clean Water Act. For purposes of this subsection, where the manure, litter, or
process wastewater has been applied in accordance with the federal regulations
under the Clean Water Act, a precipitation-related discharge of manure, litter,
or process wastewater from land areas under the control of a CAFO is an
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 30 of 35
agricultural stormwater discharge. For unpermitted Large CAFOs, a
precipitation-related discharge of manure, litter, or process wastewater from
land areas under the control of the CAFO shall be considered an exempt
agricultural stormwater discharge only where the manure, litter, or process
wastewater has been land applied in accordance with site-specific nutrient
management practices that ensure appropriate agricultural utilization of the
nutrients in the manure, litter, or process wastewater, as specified in the federal
CAFO regulations and as determined by the Secretary.
* * *
Sec. 21. 10 V.S.A. § 8003 is amended to read:
§ 8003. APPLICABILITY
(a) The Secretary may take action under this chapter to enforce the
following statutes and rules, permits, assurances, or orders implementing the
following statutes, and the Board may take such action with respect to
subdivision (10) of this subsection:
* * *
(3) 10 V.S.A. chapters 47 and 56, relating to water pollution control,
water quality standards, public water supply, and lakes in crisis;
* * *
(d) Upon the request of the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, the
Secretary may take action under this chapter to enforce the agricultural water
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 31 of 35
quality requirements of, rules adopted under, and permits and certifications
issued under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215. The Secretary of Natural Resources and
the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall enter into a memorandum
of understanding to implement this subsection execute a document that
outlines the process for implementing this subsection.
* * * Emergency Rule * * *
Sec. 22. 3 V.S.A. § 844 is amended to read:
§ 844. EMERGENCY RULES
(a) Where an agency believes that there exists an imminent peril to public
health, safety, or welfare, it may adopt an emergency rule. The rule may be
adopted without having been prefiled or filed in proposed or final proposed
form, and may be adopted after whatever notice and hearing the agency finds
to be practicable under the circumstances. The agency shall make reasonable
efforts to ensure that emergency rules are known to persons who may be
affected by them.
* * *
(g) In the alternative to the grounds specified in subsection (a) of this
section, an agency may adopt emergency amendments to existing rules using
the process set forth in this section if each of the subdivisions (1)–(5) of this
subsection applies. On a majority vote of the entire Committee, the Legislative
Committee on Administrative Rules may object to the emergency amendments
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 32 of 35
on the basis that one or more of these subdivisions do not apply or under
subdivision (e)(1)(A), (B), or (C) of this section, or both.
(1) The existing rules implement a program controlled by federal statute
or rule or by a multistate entity.
(2) The controlling federal statute or rule has been amended to require a
change in the program, or the multistate entity has made a change in the
program that is to be implemented in all of the participating states.
(3) The controlling federal statute or rule or the multistate entity requires
implementation of the change within 120 days or less.
(4) The adopting authority finds each of the following in writing:
(A) The agency cannot by the date required for implementation
complete the final adoption of amended rules using the process set forth in
sections 837 through 843 837–843 of this title.
(B) Failure to amend the rules by the date required for
implementation would cause significant harm to the public health, safety, or
welfare or significant financial loss to the State.
(5) On the date the emergency rule amendments are adopted pursuant to
this subsection, the adopting authority prefiles a corresponding permanent rule
pursuant to section 837 of this title.
(h) In addition to the grounds for emergency rulemaking under subsections
(a) and (g) of this section, an agency may adopt an emergency rule under this
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 33 of 35
section if an amendment to a federal statute, rule, or policy will materially
conflict with or threaten the ability of the agency to implement a statutory or
regulatory program required under Vermont law. On a majority vote of the
entire Committee, the Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules may
object to proposed emergency rules for adoption under this subsection on the
basis that the provisions of this subsection do not apply.
Sec. 23. SUNSET OF AGENCY EMERGENCY RULEMAKING
AUTHORITY
3 V.S.A. § 844(h) (emergency rulemaking in response to federal action) is
repealed on July 1, 2028.
* * * Emissions Repair Program * * *
Sec. 24. 2021 Acts and Resolves No. 55, Sec. 25 is amended to read:
Sec. 25. EMISSIONS REPAIR PROGRAM
(a) Program creation. The Department of Environmental Conservation, in
consultation with the Agency of Transportation, shall establish and administer
an emissions repair program that shall:
(1) apply to repairs of certain vehicles that failed the on board diagnostic
(OBD) systems inspection;
(2) provide point-of-repair vouchers and base eligibility for vouchers on
the same criteria used for income qualification for the Low Income Home
Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) through the State’s Economic Services
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 34 of 35
Division within the Department for Children and Families a Vermont
registered vehicle owner’s Vermont income tax status or adjusted gross income
of the most recent Vermont income tax return, adjusted for the number of
dependents claimed, as follows:
(A) a Vermont resident not required to file a Vermont income tax
return because the resident is not required to file a federal income tax return
qualifies for up to the maximum voucher amount of $2,500.00;
(B) a Vermont resident with an adjusted gross income at or below
185 percent of the federal poverty level as determined by the U.S. Census
Bureau qualifies for up to the maximum voucher amount of $2,500.00;
(C) a Vermont resident with an adjusted gross income at or below
250 percent of the federal poverty level as determined by the U.S. Census
Bureau qualifies for a reduced voucher amount up to $1,875.00; or
(D) a Vermont resident with an adjusted gross income at or below
300 percent of the federal poverty level as determined by the U.S. Census
Bureau qualifies for a reduced voucher amount up to $1,250.00; and
(3) provide a point-of-repair voucher to repair a motor vehicle that was
ready for testing, failed the OBD systems inspection, requires repairs that are
not under warranty, and will be able to pass the State’s vehicle inspection once
the repairs are made provided that the point-of-repair voucher is commensurate
with the fair market value of the vehicle to be repaired and does not exceed
VT LEG #385811 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.632
2026 Page 35 of 35
$2,500.00, with $2,500.00 vouchers only being available to repair vehicles
with a fair market value of at least $5,000.00.
* * *
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 25. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385811 v.1